Oklahoma, session 2026, SB2016.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 14-103.5 of Title 70, unless


there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. The Legislature finds that the workforce needs of this state


are best served by increasing access to high-quality technology


center school district programs, particularly in skilled trades and


vocational fields, through expanding opportunities for high school


student enrollment. To encourage greater participation in


technology center school district programs, the Oklahoma Department


of Career and Technology Education, in its administration of federal

Req. No. 2854 Page 1


funds received under the Carl D. Perkins Career and Technical


Education Act of 2006 and any subsequent reauthorization, shall:


1. Prioritize the allocation of leadership, reserve, and


incentive funds to support expansion of technology center school


district course availability for high school students with an


emphasis on high-demand trade occupations including, but not limited


to, welding, automotive technology, construction, electrical,


manufacturing, health careers, cosmetology, and heating,


ventilation, and air conditioning;


2. Establish performance incentives for technology center


school districts that demonstrate increased enrollment of high


school students in technology center school district courses leading


to industry-recognized credentials, certificates, or postsecondary


credit in trade fields. Such incentives may include supplemental


subgrants from available federal funds;


3. Require that at least twenty percent (20%) of state


leadership funds provided through the Carl D. Perkins Career and


Technical Education Act of 2006 be dedicated annually to initiatives


promoting high school student enrollment in technology center school


district programs including transportation assistance, tuition


waivers, outreach to underserved populations, and partnerships with


public schools in this state to integrate technology center school


pathways into individual career and academic plans (ICAPs) created



Req. No. 2854 Page 2


pursuant to Section 1210.508-4 of Title 70 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


and


4. Collaborate with the State Board of Education and the


Oklahoma State Regents for Higher Education to determine if


technology center school district courses:


a. are eligible for academic credit toward meeting the


graduation requirements set forth in Section 11-103.6


of Title 70 of the Oklahoma Statutes, and


b. are eligible for college credit at an institution of


higher education within The Oklahoma State System of


Higher Education.


B. The Oklahoma Department of Career and Technology Education


shall electronically submit an annual report to the Governor, the


President Pro Tempore of the Senate, and the Speaker of the House of


Representatives detailing the use of federal funds pursuant to this


section. The report shall include:


1. The number of high school students enrolled in technology


center school district trade programs and the percentage increase in


such enrollment compared to the prior year;


2. Outcomes related to industry credentials earned and


postsecondary transitions to trade fields; and


3. Information on the distribution of incentive funds pursuant


to subsection A of this section and their impact on the workforce


development pipeline.

Req. No. 2854 Page 3


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective September 1, 2026.




60-2-2854 EB 1/15/2026 10:00:36 AM











































Req. No. 2854 Page 4